src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10VIDRIK-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS !!= @CODE@ aabits:aabits
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AABITS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AABITS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS !!= @CODE@ heerits:heerits
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HEERITS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HEERITS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HEERITS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HEERITS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10AADRÕSʼ !!= @CODE@ aadrõsʼ:aadrõs
!:%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AADRÕSʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AADRÕSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AADRÕSʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRÕSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AADRÕSʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRÕSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HÜPÄTSʼ !!= @CODE@ hüpätsʼ:hüpätsʼ
!:%^WGStem%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HERESKʼ !!= @CODE@ hereskʼ:hereskʼ
!:%^WGStem%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HERESKʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HERESKʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HERESKʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HERESKʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESKʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_11LÄTEQ !!= @CODE@ läteq:lätte
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11LÄTEQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11LÄTEQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_11LÄTEQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_11ANNÕQ/LÄTEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_11LÄTEQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_11ANNÕQ/LÄTEQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_11AINÕQ !!= @CODE@ ainõq:ainõ
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11AINÕQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11AINÕQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_11AINÕQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_11AINÕQ/KELMEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_11AINÕQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_11AINÕQ/KELMEQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12REPÄNʼ
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12REPÄNʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12REPÄNʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12REPÄNʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_12REPÄNʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12REPÄNʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_12REPÄNʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12HOPÕNʼ
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12HOPÕNʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12HOPÕNʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12HOPÕNʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_12HOPÕNʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12HOPÕNʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_12HOPÕNʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12SÜKÜS
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12SÜKÜS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12SÜKÜS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12SÜKÜS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_12SÜKÜS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12SÜKÜS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_12SÜKÜS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12NÕKÕSʼ
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_13ALONÕ !!= @CODE@ alonõ:alo
!! Gradation: No
!:%>dsõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_13ALONÕ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_13ALONÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_13ALONÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONÕ/TÄHINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_13ALONÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONÕ/TÄHINE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_13TÄHINE !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
!! Gradation: No
!:%>dse PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_13TÄHINE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_13TÄHINE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_13TÄHINE-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONÕ/TÄHINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_13TÄHINE-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONÕ/TÄHINE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_14RITSʼKAS !!= @CODE@ ritsʼkas:ritsʼka, saabas:saapa
!! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14RITSʼKAS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14RITSʼKAS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_14RITSʼKAS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_14RITSʼKAS/HERNEH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_14RITSʼKAS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_14RITSʼKAS/HERNEH-PL ;!


!LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS !!= @CODE@ hammas:hamba, saabas:saapa
!! gradation: yes
!!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to gradation
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14HAMMAS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14HAMMAS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKÄS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKÄS-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
! vowel_harmony: front
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to word final h
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_PEREH-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_PEREH-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_PEREH-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_PEREH-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_HAMÕH !!= @CODE@ hamõh:hamõh
! vowel_harmony: back
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to word final h
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_HAMÕH-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_HAMÕH-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAMÕH-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_HAMÕH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAMÕH-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_HAMÕH-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: __N-kotus15__
!:õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15KOTUS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15KOTUS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@
!!! inemine:inemi
!! Gradation: No
!!! * Yaml: __N-inemine16__
!:%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_16INEMINE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_16INEMINE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_16ABILINÕ/INEMINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_16ABILINÕ/INEMINE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_16ABILINÕ !!= @CODE@
!! abilinõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: __N-abilinw16__
!:%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_16ABILINÕ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_16ABILINÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_16ABILINÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_16ABILINÕ/INEMINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_16ABILINÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_16ABILINÕ/INEMINE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS
:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18AIVASTUS-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITÜS-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITÜS-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_18EHITÜS
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18EHITÜS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18EHITÜS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_18EHITÜS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITÜS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_18EHITÜS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITÜS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANÕ !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
! Gradation: No
!:%>dsõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_19ALOMANÕ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_19ALOMANÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_19PEDÄJÄNE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
!:%>dse PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!	PROP_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
!	PROP_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_20VÄITSʼ
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_20VÄITSʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_20VÄITSʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_21HÜDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hüdsi
!:%^VowRM%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_21HÜDSI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_21HÜDSI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_21HÜDSI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_21HÜDSI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_21HÜDSI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_21HÜDSI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_22VÕROKÕNÕ !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
!:%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_22VÄHÄKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
!! Gradation: No
!:%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VÄHÄKENE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VÄHÄKENE-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VÄHÄKENE-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_23NUULʼ !!= * @CODE@ nuulʼ:nool
!! Gradation: No
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_23NUULʼ-SG ;
! PROP_23NUULʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_23NUULʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_23NUULʼ/KIILʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_23NUULʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_23NUULʼ/KIILʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_23KIILʼ  !!= * @CODE@ kiilʼ:keel
!! Gradation: No
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_23KIILʼ-SG ;
! PROP_23KIILʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_23KIILʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_23NUULʼ/KIILʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_23KIILʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_23NUULʼ/KIILʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_24KÄSI
!! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
!:e%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_24KÄSI-SG ;
! PROP_24KÄSI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_24KÄSI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_24KÄSI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_24KÄSI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_24KÄSI-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI
!! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
!:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_24SUSI-SG ;
! PROP_24SUSI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_25SÜÄ
!:%>me PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25SÜÄ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25SÜÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_25SÜÄ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_25SÜÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_25SÜÄ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_25SÜÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_25ASÕQ
!:mõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25ASÕQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25ASÕQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_25ASÕQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_25ASÕQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_25ASÕQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_25ASÕQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEMʼ
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ; !FIXME 2016-08-31
! PROP_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
! PROP_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEMʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEMʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ; ! FIXME 2016-08-31
! PROP_27EHEQ-SG ;
! PROP_27EHEQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
!! gradation: yes
!:%^VowRM%>nõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_HAPU-SG ;
! PROP_HAPU-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAPU-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAPU-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28TÜTÄRʼ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
! PROP_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28KANNÕLʼ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28KANNÕLʼ-SG ;
! PROP_28KANNÕLʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28KANNÕLʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_28KANNÕLʼ/KINNERʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28KANNÕLʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_28KANNÕLʼ/KINNERʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28PUNDAR-SG ;
! PROP_28PUNDAR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KÄMMÄL-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KÄMMÄL-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_29KUU-SG ;
! PROP_29KUU-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_29KUU-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_29KUU-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_29KUU-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_29KUU-PL ;
